Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-165
Vital resource emergency; legislative determination; response of Governor.

If the Legislature determines by resolution that a vital resource emergency exists it shall transmit such resolution to the Governor. The Governor shall respond in writing to such legislative resolution within ten days, stating his or her plan, if an emergency proclamation is to be issued pursuant to the resolution, and stating the reason or reasons for not issuing such proclamation if action is not going to be taken.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 54.